Illinois, session 104th, SB2802.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 7-132, 7-158, 7-164, 7-172, 7-205, and 7-206 6as follows: 7    (40 ILCS 5/7-132)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-132)8    Sec. 7-132. Municipalities, instrumentalities and 9participating instrumentalities included and effective dates.10(A) Municipalities and their instrumentalities.11    (a) The following described municipalities, but not 12including any with more than 1,000,000 inhabitants, and the 13instrumentalities thereof, shall be included within and be 14subject to this Article beginning upon the effective dates 15specified by the Board:16        (1) Except as to the municipalities and 17    instrumentalities thereof specifically excluded under this 18    Article, every county shall be subject to this Article, 19    and all cities, villages and incorporated towns having a 20    population in excess of 5,000 inhabitants as determined by 21    the last preceding decennial or subsequent federal census, 22    shall be subject to this Article following publication of 23    the census by the Bureau of the Census. Within 90 days   SB2802 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1    after publication of the census, the Board shall notify 2    any municipality that has become subject to this Article 3    as a result of that census, and shall provide information 4    to the corporate authorities of the municipality 5    explaining the duties and consequences of participation. 6    The notification shall also include a proposed date upon 7    which participation by the municipality will commence.8        However, for any city, village or incorporated town 9    that attains a population over 5,000 inhabitants after 10    having provided social security coverage for its employees 11    under the Social Security Enabling Act, participation 12    under this Article shall not be mandatory but may be 13    elected in accordance with subparagraph (3) or (4) of this 14    paragraph (a), whichever is applicable.15        (2) School districts, other than those specifically 16    excluded under this Article, shall be subject to this 17    Article, without election, with respect to all employees 18    thereof.19        (3) Towns and all other bodies politic and corporate 20    which are formed by vote of, or are subject to control by, 21    the electors in towns and are located in towns which are 22    not participating municipalities on the effective date of 23    this Act, may become subject to this Article by election 24    pursuant to Section 7-132.1.25        (4) Any other municipality (together with its 26    instrumentalities), other than those specifically excluded   SB2802 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1    from participation and those described in paragraph (3) 2    above, may elect to be included either by referendum under 3    Section 7-134 or by the adoption of a resolution or 4    ordinance by its governing body. A copy of such resolution 5    or ordinance duly authenticated and certified by the clerk 6    of the municipality or other appropriate official of its 7    governing body shall constitute the required notice to the 8    board of such action.9    (b) A municipality that is about to begin participation 10shall submit to the Board an application to participate, in a 11form acceptable to the Board, not later than 90 days prior to 12the proposed effective date of participation. The Board shall 13act upon the application within 90 days, and if it finds that 14the application is in conformity with its requirements and the 15requirements of this Article, participation by the applicant 16shall commence on a date acceptable to the municipality and 17specified by the Board, but in no event more than one year from 18the date of application.19    (c) A participating municipality which succeeds to the 20functions of a participating municipality which is dissolved 21or terminates its existence shall assume and be transferred 22the net accumulation balance in the municipality reserve and 23the municipality account receivable balance of the terminated 24municipality.25    (d) In the case of a Veterans Assistance Commission whose 26employees were being treated by the Fund on January 1, 1990 as   SB2802 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1employees of the county served by the Commission, the Fund may 2continue to treat the employees of the Veterans Assistance 3Commission as county employees for the purposes of this 4Article, unless the Commission becomes a participating 5instrumentality in accordance with subsection (B) of this 6Section. 7(B) Participating instrumentalities.8    (a) The participating instrumentalities designated in 9paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be included within and 10be subject to this Article if:11        (1) an application to participate, in a form 12    acceptable to the Board and adopted by a two-thirds vote 13    of the governing body, is presented to the Board not later 14    than 90 days prior to the proposed effective date; and15        (2) the Board finds that the application is in 16    conformity with its requirements, that the applicant has 17    reasonable expectation to continue as a political entity 18    for a period of at least 10 years and has the prospective 19    financial capacity to meet its current and future 20    obligations to the Fund, and that the actuarial soundness 21    of the Fund may be reasonably expected to be unimpaired by 22    approval of participation by the applicant.23    The Board shall notify the applicant of its findings 24within 90 days after receiving the application, and if the 25Board approves the application, participation by the applicant   SB2802 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1shall commence on the effective date specified by the Board.2    (b) The following participating instrumentalities, so long 3as they meet the requirements of Section 7-108 and the area 4served by them or within their jurisdiction is not located 5entirely within a municipality having more than one million 6inhabitants, may be included hereunder:7        i. Township School District Trustees.8        ii. Multiple County and Consolidated Health 9    Departments created under Division 5-25 of the Counties 10    Code or its predecessor law.11        iii. Public Building Commissions created under the 12    Public Building Commission Act, and located in counties of 13    less than 1,000,000 inhabitants.14        iv. A multitype, consolidated or cooperative library 15    system created under the Illinois Library System Act. Any 16    library system created under the Illinois Library System 17    Act that has one or more predecessors that participated in 18    the Fund may participate in the Fund upon application. The 19    Board shall establish procedures for implementing the 20    transfer of rights and obligations from the predecessor 21    system to the successor system.22        v. Regional Planning Commissions created under 23    Division 5-14 of the Counties Code or its predecessor law.24        vi. Local Public Housing Authorities created under the 25    Housing Authorities Act, located in counties of less than 26    1,000,000 inhabitants.  SB2802 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1        vii. Illinois Municipal League.2        viii. Northeastern Illinois Metropolitan Area Planning 3    Commission.4        ix. Southwestern Illinois Metropolitan Area Planning 5    Commission.6        x. Illinois Association of Park Districts.7        xi. Illinois Supervisors, County Commissioners and 8    Superintendents of Highways Association.9        xii. Tri-City Regional Port District.10        xiii. An association, or not-for-profit corporation, 11    membership in which is authorized under Section 85-15 of 12    the Township Code.13        xiv. Drainage Districts operating under the Illinois 14    Drainage Code.15        xv. Local mass transit districts created under the 16    Local Mass Transit District Act.17        xvi. Soil and water conservation districts created 18    under the Soil and Water Conservation Districts Law.19        xvii. Commissions created to provide water supply or 20    sewer services or both under Division 135, Division 135.5, 21    or Division 136 of Article 11 of the Illinois Municipal 22    Code.23        xviii. Public water districts created under the Public 24    Water District Act.25        xix. Veterans Assistance Commissions established under 26    Section 9 of the Military Veterans Assistance Act that   SB2802 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1    serve counties with a population of less than 1,000,000.2        xx. The governing body of an entity, other than a 3    vocational education cooperative, created under an 4    intergovernmental cooperative agreement established 5    between participating municipalities under the 6    Intergovernmental Cooperation Act, which by the terms of 7    the agreement is the employer of the persons performing 8    services under the agreement under the usual common law 9    rules determining the employer-employee relationship. The 10    governing body of such an intergovernmental cooperative 11    entity established prior to July 1, 1988 may make 12    participation retroactive to the effective date of the 13    agreement and, if so, the effective date of participation 14    shall be the date the required application is filed with 15    the fund. If any such entity is unable to pay the required 16    employer contributions to the fund, then the participating 17    municipalities shall make payment of the required 18    contributions and the payments shall be allocated as 19    provided in the agreement or, if not so provided, equally 20    among them.21        xxi. The Illinois Municipal Electric Agency.22        xxii. The Waukegan Port District.23        xxiii. The Fox Waterway Agency created under the Fox 24    Waterway Agency Act.25        xxiv. The Illinois Municipal Gas Agency.26        xxv. The Kaskaskia Regional Port District.  SB2802 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1        xxvi. The Southwestern Illinois Development Authority.2        xxvii. The Cairo Public Utility Company.3        xxviii. Except with respect to employees who elect to 4    participate in the State Employees' Retirement System of 5    Illinois under Section 14-104.13 of this Code, the Chicago 6    Metropolitan Agency for Planning created under the 7    Regional Planning Act, provided that, with respect to the 8    benefits payable pursuant to Sections 7-146, 7-150, and 9    7-164 and the requirement that eligibility for such 10    benefits is conditional upon satisfying a minimum period 11    of service or a minimum contribution, any employee of the 12    Chicago Metropolitan Agency for Planning that was 13    immediately prior to such employment an employee of the 14    Chicago Area Transportation Study or the Northeastern 15    Illinois Planning Commission, such employee's service at 16    the Chicago Area Transportation Study or the Northeastern 17    Illinois Planning Commission and contributions to the 18    State Employees' Retirement System of Illinois established 19    under Article 14 and the Illinois Municipal Retirement 20    Fund shall count towards the satisfaction of such 21    requirements. 22        xxix. United Counties Council (formerly the Urban 23    Counties Council), but only if the Council has a ruling 24    from the United States Internal Revenue Service that it is 25    a governmental entity. 26        xxx. The Will County Governmental League, but only if   SB2802 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1    the League has a ruling from the United States Internal 2    Revenue Service that it is a governmental entity.3        xxxi. The Firefighters' Pension Investment Fund. 4        xxxii. The Police Officers' Pension Investment Fund.5        xxxiii. The Joliet Regional Port District. 6    (c) The governing boards of special education joint 7agreements created under Section 10-22.31 of the School Code 8without designation of an administrative district shall be 9included within and be subject to this Article as 10participating instrumentalities when the joint agreement 11becomes effective. However, the governing board of any such 12special education joint agreement in effect before September 135, 1975 shall not be subject to this Article unless the joint 14agreement is modified by the school districts to provide that 15the governing board is subject to this Article, except as 16otherwise provided by this Section.17    The governing board of the Special Education District of 18Lake County shall become subject to this Article as a 19participating instrumentality on July 1, 1997. Notwithstanding 20subdivision (a)1 of Section 7-139, on the effective date of 21participation, employees of the governing board of the Special 22Education District of Lake County shall receive creditable 23service for their prior service with that employer, up to a 24maximum of 5 years, without any employee contribution. 25Employees may establish creditable service for the remainder 26of their prior service with that employer, if any, by applying   SB2802 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1in writing and paying an employee contribution in an amount 2determined by the Fund, based on the employee contribution 3rates in effect at the time of application for the creditable 4service and the employee's salary rate on the effective date 5of participation for that employer, plus interest at the 6effective rate from the date of the prior service to the date 7of payment. Application for this creditable service must be 8made before July 1, 1998; the payment may be made at any time 9while the employee is still in service. The employer may elect 10to make the required contribution on behalf of the employee.11    The governing board of a special education joint agreement 12created under Section 10-22.31 of the School Code for which an 13administrative district has been designated, if there are 14employees of the cooperative educational entity who are not 15employees of the administrative district, may elect to 16participate in the Fund and be included within this Article as 17a participating instrumentality, subject to such application 18procedures and rules as the Board may prescribe.19    The Boards of Control of cooperative or joint educational 20programs or projects created and administered under Section 213-15.14 of the School Code, whether or not the Boards act as 22their own administrative district, shall be included within 23and be subject to this Article as participating 24instrumentalities when the agreement establishing the 25cooperative or joint educational program or project becomes 26effective.  SB2802 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1    The governing board of a special education joint agreement 2entered into after June 30, 1984 and prior to September 17, 31985 which provides for representation on the governing board 4by less than all the participating districts shall be included 5within and subject to this Article as a participating 6instrumentality. Such participation shall be effective as of 7the date the joint agreement becomes effective.8    The governing boards of educational service centers 9established under Section 2-3.62 of the School Code shall be 10included within and subject to this Article as participating 11instrumentalities. The governing boards of vocational 12education cooperative agreements created under the 13Intergovernmental Cooperation Act and approved by the State 14Board of Education shall be included within and be subject to 15this Article as participating instrumentalities. If any such 16governing boards or boards of control are unable to pay the 17required employer contributions to the fund, then the school 18districts served by such boards shall make payment of required 19contributions as provided in Section 7-172. The payments shall 20be allocated among the several school districts in proportion 21to the number of students in average daily attendance for the 22last full school year for each district in relation to the 23total number of students in average attendance for such period 24for all districts served. If such educational service centers, 25vocational education cooperatives or cooperative or joint 26educational programs or projects created and administered   SB2802 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1under Section 3-15.14 of the School Code are dissolved, the 2assets and obligations shall be distributed among the 3districts in the same proportions unless otherwise provided.4    The governing board of Paris Cooperative High School shall 5be included within and be subject to this Article as a 6participating instrumentality on the effective date of this 7amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly. If the governing 8board of Paris Cooperative High School is unable to pay the 9required employer contributions to the fund, then the school 10districts served shall make payment of required contributions 11as provided in Section 7-172. The payments shall be allocated 12among the several school districts in proportion to the number 13of students in average daily attendance for the last full 14school year for each district in relation to the total number 15of students in average attendance for such period for all 16districts served. If Paris Cooperative High School is 17dissolved, then the assets and obligations shall be 18distributed among the districts in the same proportions unless 19otherwise provided. 20    The Philip J. Rock Center and School shall be included 21within and be subject to this Article as a participating 22instrumentality on the effective date of this amendatory Act 23of the 97th General Assembly. The Philip J. Rock Center and 24School shall certify to the Fund the dates of service of all 25employees within 90 days of the effective date of this 26amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly. The Fund shall   SB2802 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1transfer to the IMRF account of the Philip J. Rock Center and 2School all creditable service and all employer contributions 3made on behalf of the employees for service at the Philip J. 4Rock Center and School that were reported and paid to IMRF by 5another employer prior to this date. If the Philip J. Rock 6Center and School is unable to pay the required employer 7contributions to the Fund, then the amount due will be paid by 8all employers as defined in item (2) of paragraph (a) of 9subsection (A) of this Section. The payments shall be 10allocated among these employers in proportion to the number of 11students in average daily attendance for the last full school 12year for each district in relation to the total number of 13students in average attendance for such period for all 14districts. If the Philip J. Rock Center and School is 15dissolved, then its IMRF assets and obligations shall be 16distributed in the same proportions unless otherwise provided. 17    Financial Oversight Panels established under Article 1H of 18the School Code shall be included within and be subject to this 19Article as a participating instrumentality on the effective 20date of this amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly. If 21the Financial Oversight Panel is unable to pay the required 22employer contributions to the fund, then the school districts 23served shall make payment of required contributions as 24provided in Section 7-172. If the Financial Oversight Panel is 25dissolved, then the assets and obligations shall be 26distributed to the district served.   SB2802 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1    (d) The governing boards of special recreation joint 2agreements created under Section 8-10b of the Park District 3Code, operating without designation of an administrative 4district or an administrative municipality appointed to 5administer the program operating under the authority of such 6joint agreement shall be included within and be subject to 7this Article as participating instrumentalities when the joint 8agreement becomes effective. However, the governing board of 9any such special recreation joint agreement in effect before 10January 1, 1980 shall not be subject to this Article unless the 11joint agreement is modified, by the districts and 12municipalities which are parties to the agreement, to provide 13that the governing board is subject to this Article.14    If the Board returns any employer and employee 15contributions to any employer which erroneously submitted such 16contributions on behalf of a special recreation joint 17agreement, the Board shall include interest computed from the 18end of each year to the date of payment, not compounded, at the 19rate of 7% per annum.20    (e) Each multi-township assessment district, the board of 21trustees of which has adopted this Article by ordinance prior 22to April 1, 1982, shall be a participating instrumentality 23included within and subject to this Article effective December 241, 1981. The contributions required under Section 7-172 shall 25be included in the budget prepared under and allocated in 26accordance with Section 2-30 of the Property Tax Code.  SB2802 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1    (f) The Illinois Medical District Commission created under 2the Illinois Medical District Act may be included within and 3subject to this Article as a participating instrumentality, 4notwithstanding that the location of the District is entirely 5within the City of Chicago. To become a participating 6instrumentality, the Commission must apply to the Board in the 7manner set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (B). If 8the Board approves the application, under the criteria and 9procedures set forth in paragraph (a) and any other applicable 10rules, criteria, and procedures of the Board, participation by 11the Commission shall commence on the effective date specified 12by the Board.  13(C) Prospective participants. Beginning January 1, 1992, each 14prospective participating municipality or participating 15instrumentality shall pay to the Fund the cost, as determined 16by the Board, of a study prepared by the Fund or its actuary, 17detailing the prospective costs of participation in the Fund 18to be expected by the municipality or instrumentality.19(Source: P.A. 104-284, eff. 8-15-25.) 20    (40 ILCS 5/7-158)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-158)21    Sec. 7-158. Surviving spouse annuities; options annuities -22 Options. In lieu of the surviving spouse annuity an eligible 23surviving spouse shall have the option of receiving other 24benefits as follows:  SB2802 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1    1. The surviving spouse of a participating employee may 2elect to receive either a single sum death benefit or a 3surviving spouse annuity and the $8,000 ($3,000 for those who 4first retired prior to the effective date of this amendatory 5Act of the 104th General Assembly) $3,000 death benefit 6provided in Sections 7-163 and 7-164.7    2. The surviving spouse of an employee, who has separated 8from service and would have been entitled to a retirement 9annuity on date of death, may elect to receive either a single 10sum death benefit or a surviving spouse annuity and the $8,000 11($3,000 for those who first retired prior to the effective 12date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly) 13$3,000 death benefit provided in Sections 7-163 and 7-164.14    3. If any surviving spouse annuity is payable prior to the 15earliest age at which the recipient will become eligible for a 16widows' or widowers' insurance benefit under the Federal 17Social Security Act, the recipient may elect that the annuity 18payments from this fund shall exceed those payable after 19attaining such age by an amount not in excess of the estimated 20Social Security Benefit, determined as of the effective date 21of the surviving spouse annuity, provided that in no case 22shall the total annuity payments made by this fund exceed in 23actuarial value the annuity which would have been paid had no 24such election been made.25    4. The surviving spouse of a participating employee, whose 26annuity was suspended upon return to employment and who had   SB2802 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1one year or more of service after his return, may apply the 2additional service credits to a supplemental surviving spouse 3annuity and receive the $8,000 ($3,000 for those who first 4retired prior to the effective date of this amendatory Act of 5the 104th General Assembly) $3,000 death benefit or apply the 6additional service credits to a single sum death benefit and 7forego the $8,000 ($3,000 for those who first retired prior to 8the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 9Assembly) $3,000 death benefit payable upon the death of an 10annuitant.11    5. The surviving spouse of a participating employee, whose 12annuity was suspended upon return to employment and who had 13less than one year of service after his return, shall have the 14additional service credits applied towards a supplemental 15surviving spouse annuity and shall receive the $8,000 ($3,000 16for those who first retired prior to the effective date of this 17amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly) $3,000 death 18benefit.19(Source: P.A. 85-941.) 20    (40 ILCS 5/7-164)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-164)21    Sec. 7-164. Death benefits; amount benefits - Amount. The 22amount of the death benefit shall be:23        1. Upon the death of an employee with at least one year 24    of service occurring while in an employment relationship 25    (including employees drawing disability benefits) with a   SB2802 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1    participating municipality or participating 2    instrumentality, an amount equal to the sum of:3             (a) The employee's normal, additional and 4        survivor credits, including interest credited thereto 5        through the end of the preceding calendar year, but 6        excluding credits and interest thereon allowed for 7        periods of disability.8             (b) An amount equal to the employee's annual 9        final rate of earnings. An employee who dies as a 10        result of injuries connected with his duties shall be 11        considered to have a year of service for purposes of 12        this benefit.13        2. Upon the death of an employee with less than 1 year 14    of service occurring while in the service of any 15    participating municipality or instrumentality, an amount 16    equal to the sum of his accumulated normal, additional and 17    survivor credits on the date of death, excluding those 18    credits and interest thereon allowed during periods of 19    disability.20        3. Upon the death of an employee who has separated 21    from service and was not entitled to a retirement annuity 22    on the date of death, an amount equal to the sum of his 23    accumulated normal, survivor and additional credits on the 24    date of death excluding those credits and interest thereon 25    allowed during periods of disability.26        4. Upon the death of an employee in an employment   SB2802 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1    relationship, or an employee who has service and was 2    entitled to a retirement annuity on the date of death, 3    when a surviving spouse or child annuity is awarded, 4    $8,000 ($3,000 for those who first retired prior to the 5    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 6    Assembly) $3,000.7        5. Upon the death of an employee, who has separated 8    from service and was entitled to a retirement annuity on 9    the date of death, and no surviving spouse or child 10    annuity is awarded, $8,000 ($3,000 for those who first 11    retired prior to the effective date of this amendatory Act 12    of the 104th General Assembly) $3,000 plus an amount equal 13    to his accumulated normal, survivor and additional credits 14    on the date of death, excluding those credits and interest 15    earned thereon allowed during periods of disability.16        6. Upon the death of an employee annuitant, $8,000 17    ($3,000 for those who first retired prior to the effective 18    date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly) 19    $3,000 and, unless a surviving spouse, child or 20    reversionary annuity is payable, the sum of (i) the excess 21    of the normal and survivor credits, excluding those 22    allowed during periods of disability, which the annuitant 23    had as of the effective date of his annuity over the total 24    annuities paid pursuant to paragraph (a) 1 of Section 25    7-142 to the date of death, plus (ii) the excess of the 26    additional credits, excluding any such credits used to   SB2802 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1    create a reversionary annuity, used to provide the annuity 2    granted pursuant to paragraph (a) 2 of Section 7-142 over 3    the total annuity payments made pursuant thereto to the 4    time of death.5        7. Upon the death of an annuitant receiving a 6    reversionary annuity or of a person designated to receive 7    a reversionary annuity prior to the receipt of such 8    annuity the sum of the additional credits of the person 9    creating the reversionary annuity as of the effective date 10    of his own retirement annuity over the reversionary 11    annuity payments, if any, made prior to the date of death 12    of such annuitant or person designated to receive the 13    reversionary annuity.14        8. Upon the death of an annuitant receiving a 15    beneficiary annuity which was effective before January 1, 16    1986, the excess of the death benefit which was used to 17    provide the annuity, over the sum of all annuity payments 18    made to the beneficiary. Upon the death of an annuitant 19    receiving a beneficiary annuity effective January 1, 1986 20    or thereafter, the sum of (i) the excess of the normal and 21    survivor credits, excluding those allowed during periods 22    of disability, which the annuitant had as of the effective 23    date of his annuity over the total annuities paid pursuant 24    to paragraph (c) of Section 7-165, to date of death, plus 25    (ii) the excess of the additional credits, excluding any 26    such credits used to create a reversionary annuity, used   SB2802 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1    to provide the annuity granted pursuant to paragraph (d) 2    of Section 7-165 over the total annuity payments made 3    pursuant thereto to the time of death.4        9. Upon the marriage prior to reaching age 55 (except 5    for a surviving spouse who remarries after December 31, 6    2000) or death of a person receiving a surviving spouse 7    annuity, unless a child annuity is payable, the sum of (i) 8    the excess of the normal and survivor credits, excluding 9    those credits and interest thereon allowed during periods 10    of disability, attributable to the employee at the 11    effective date of the annuity or date of death, whichever 12    first occurred, over the total of all annuity payments 13    attributable to paragraph (a) 1 of Section 7-142 made to 14    the employee or surviving spouse plus (ii) the excess of 15    the additional credits, excluding any such credits used to 16    create a reversionary annuity or used to provide the 17    annuity attributable to paragraph (a) 2 of Section 7-142 18    over the total of such payments.19        10. Upon the marriage, death or attainment of age 18 20    of a child receiving a child annuity, if no other child 21    annuities are payable, the sum of (i) the excess of the 22    normal and survivor credits excluding those credits and 23    interest thereon allowed during periods of disability, of 24    the employee at the effective date of the annuity or date 25    of death, whichever first occurred, over the total annuity 26    payments attributable to paragraph (a) 1 of Section 7-142   SB2802 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1    made to the employee, surviving spouse and children plus 2    (ii) the excess of the additional credits, excluding any 3    such credits used to create a reversionary annuity, used 4    to provide the annuity attributable to paragraph (a) 2 of 5    Section 7-142 over the total annuity payments made to the 6    employee, surviving spouse and children, pursuant thereto.7        11. Upon the death of the participating employee whose 8    annuity was suspended upon his return to employment:9             a. If a surviving spouse or child annuity is 10        awarded, $8,000 ($3,000 for those who first retired 11        prior to the effective date of this amendatory Act of 12        the 104th General Assembly) $3,000;13             b. If no surviving spouse or child annuity is 14        awarded and he had less than one year's service upon 15        return, $8,000 ($3,000 for those who first retired 16        prior to the effective date of this amendatory Act of 17        the 104th General Assembly) $3,000 plus the excess of 18        the normal, survivor and additional credits, including 19        interest thereon, but excluding those allowed during a 20        period of disability, at the effective date of the 21        suspended annuity, plus those allowed after his 22        return, over all annuity payments made to the 23        employee;24             c. If no surviving spouse or child annuity is 25        awarded and he has one year or more of service upon 26        return, the higher of (a) the payment under   SB2802 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1        subparagraph b of this paragraph or (b) the payment 2        under paragraph 1 of this Section, taking into 3        consideration only the service and credits allowed 4        after his return, plus the excess of the normal, 5        survivor and additional credits, including interest 6        thereon, excluding those allowed during periods of 7        disability, at the effective date of his suspended 8        annuity over all annuity payments made to the 9        employee.10    12. The $8,000 ($3,000 for those who first retired prior 11to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 12General Assembly) $3,000 death benefit provided in paragraphs 134 and 6 shall not be payable to beneficiaries of persons who 14terminated service prior to September 8, 1971, unless the 15payment or agreement for payment provided by Section 7-144.2 16of this Article is made prior to the date of death.17    13. The increase in certain death benefits from $1,000 to 18$3,000 provided by this amendatory Act of 1987 shall apply 19only to deaths occurring on or after January 1, 1988.20    The increase in certain death benefits from $3,000 to 21$8,000 provided by this amendatory Act of the 104th General 22Assembly shall apply only to deaths occurring on or after 23January 1, 2027. 24(Source: P.A. 91-887, eff. 7-6-00.) 25    (40 ILCS 5/7-172)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-172)  SB2802 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1    Sec. 7-172. Contributions by participating municipalities 2and participating instrumentalities.3    (a) Each participating municipality and each participating 4instrumentality shall make payment to the fund as follows:5        1. municipality contributions in an amount determined 6    by applying the municipality contribution rate to each 7    payment of earnings paid to each of its participating 8    employees;9        2. an amount equal to the employee contributions 10    provided by paragraph (a) of Section 7-173, whether or not 11    the employee contributions are withheld as permitted by 12    that Section;13        3. all accounts receivable, together with interest 14    charged thereon, as provided in Section 7-209, and any 15    amounts due under subsection (a-5) of Section 7-144;16        4. if it has no participating employees with current 17    earnings, an amount payable which, over a closed period of 18    20 years for participating municipalities and 10 years for 19    participating instrumentalities, will amortize, at the 20    effective rate for that year, any unfunded obligation. The 21    unfunded obligation shall be computed as provided in 22    paragraph 2 of subsection (b);23        5. if it has fewer than 7 participating employees or a 24    negative balance in its municipality reserve, the greater 25    of (A) an amount payable that, over a period of 20 years, 26    will amortize at the effective rate for that year any   SB2802 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1    unfunded obligation, computed as provided in paragraph 2 2    of subsection (b) or (B) the amount required by paragraph 3    1 of this subsection (a). 4    (b) A separate municipality contribution rate shall be 5determined for each calendar year for all participating 6municipalities together with all instrumentalities thereof. 7The municipality contribution rate shall be determined for 8participating instrumentalities as if they were participating 9municipalities. The municipality contribution rate shall be 10the sum of the following percentages:11        1. The percentage of earnings of all the participating 12    employees of all participating municipalities and 13    participating instrumentalities which, if paid over the 14    entire period of their service, will be sufficient when 15    combined with all employee contributions available for the 16    payment of benefits, to provide all annuities for 17    participating employees, and the $8,000 ($3,000 for those 18    who first retired prior to the effective date of this 19    amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly) $3,000 death 20    benefit payable under Sections 7-158 and 7-164, such 21    percentage to be known as the normal cost rate.22        2. The percentage of earnings of the participating 23    employees of each participating municipality and 24    participating instrumentalities necessary to adjust for 25    the difference between the present value of all benefits, 26    excluding temporary and total and permanent disability and   SB2802 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1    death benefits, to be provided for its participating 2    employees and the sum of its accumulated municipality 3    contributions and the accumulated employee contributions 4    and the present value of expected future employee and 5    municipality contributions pursuant to subparagraph 1 of 6    this paragraph (b). This adjustment shall be spread over a 7    period determined by the Board, not to exceed 30 years for 8    participating municipalities or 10 years for participating 9    instrumentalities.10        3. The percentage of earnings of the participating 11    employees of all municipalities and participating 12    instrumentalities necessary to provide the present value 13    of all temporary and total and permanent disability 14    benefits granted during the most recent year for which 15    information is available.16        4. The percentage of earnings of the participating 17    employees of all participating municipalities and 18    participating instrumentalities necessary to provide the 19    present value of the net single sum death benefits 20    expected to become payable from the reserve established 21    under Section 7-206 during the year for which this rate is 22    fixed.23        5. The percentage of earnings necessary to meet any 24    deficiency arising in the Terminated Municipality Reserve.25    (c) A separate municipality contribution rate shall be 26computed for each participating municipality or participating   SB2802 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1instrumentality for its sheriff's law enforcement employees.2    A separate municipality contribution rate shall be 3computed for the sheriff's law enforcement employees of each 4forest preserve district that elects to have such employees. 5For the period from January 1, 1986 to December 31, 1986, such 6rate shall be the forest preserve district's regular rate plus 72%.8    In the event that the Board determines that there is an 9actuarial deficiency in the account of any municipality with 10respect to a person who has elected to participate in the Fund 11under Section 3-109.1 of this Code, the Board may adjust the 12municipality's contribution rate so as to make up that 13deficiency over such reasonable period of time as the Board 14may determine.15    (d) The Board may establish a separate municipality 16contribution rate for all employees who are program 17participants employed under the federal Comprehensive 18Employment Training Act by all of the participating 19municipalities and instrumentalities. The Board may also 20provide that, in lieu of a separate municipality rate for 21these employees, a portion of the municipality contributions 22for such program participants shall be refunded or an extra 23charge assessed so that the amount of municipality 24contributions retained or received by the fund for all CETA 25program participants shall be an amount equal to that which 26would be provided by the separate municipality contribution   SB2802 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1rate for all such program participants. Refunds shall be made 2to prime sponsors of programs upon submission of a claim 3therefor and extra charges shall be assessed to participating 4municipalities and instrumentalities. In establishing the 5municipality contribution rate as provided in paragraph (b) of 6this Section, the use of a separate municipality contribution 7rate for program participants or the refund of a portion of the 8municipality contributions, as the case may be, may be 9considered.10    (e) Computations of municipality contribution rates for 11the following calendar year shall be made prior to the 12beginning of each year, from the information available at the 13time the computations are made, and on the assumption that the 14employees in each participating municipality or participating 15instrumentality at such time will continue in service until 16the end of such calendar year at their respective rates of 17earnings at such time.18    (f) Any municipality which is the recipient of State 19allocations representing that municipality's contributions for 20retirement annuity purposes on behalf of its employees as 21provided in Section 12-21.16 of the Illinois Public Aid Code 22shall pay the allocations so received to the Board for such 23purpose. Estimates of State allocations to be received during 24any taxable year shall be considered in the determination of 25the municipality's tax rate for that year under Section 7-171. 26If a special tax is levied under Section 7-171, none of the   SB2802 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1proceeds may be used to reimburse the municipality for the 2amount of State allocations received and paid to the Board. 3Any multiple-county or consolidated health department which 4receives contributions from a county under Section 11.2 of "An 5Act in relation to establishment and maintenance of county and 6multiple-county health departments", approved July 9, 1943, as 7amended, or distributions under Section 3 of the Department of 8Public Health Act, shall use these only for municipality 9contributions by the health department.10    (g) Municipality contributions for the several purposes 11specified shall, for township treasurers and employees in the 12offices of the township treasurers who meet the qualifying 13conditions for coverage hereunder, be allocated among the 14several school districts and parts of school districts 15serviced by such treasurers and employees in the proportion 16which the amount of school funds of each district or part of a 17district handled by the treasurer bears to the total amount of 18all school funds handled by the treasurer.19    From the funds subject to allocation among districts and 20parts of districts pursuant to the School Code, the trustees 21shall withhold the proportionate share of the liability for 22municipality contributions imposed upon such districts by this 23Section, in respect to such township treasurers and employees 24and remit the same to the Board.25    The municipality contribution rate for an educational 26service center shall initially be the same rate for each year   SB2802 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1as the regional office of education or school district which 2serves as its administrative agent. When actuarial data become 3available, a separate rate shall be established as provided in 4subparagraph (i) of this Section.5    The municipality contribution rate for a public agency, 6other than a vocational education cooperative, formed under 7the Intergovernmental Cooperation Act shall initially be the 8average rate for the municipalities which are parties to the 9intergovernmental agreement. When actuarial data become 10available, a separate rate shall be established as provided in 11subparagraph (i) of this Section.12    (h) Each participating municipality and participating 13instrumentality shall make the contributions in the amounts 14provided in this Section in the manner prescribed from time to 15time by the Board and all such contributions shall be 16obligations of the respective participating municipalities and 17participating instrumentalities to this fund. The failure to 18deduct any employee contributions shall not relieve the 19participating municipality or participating instrumentality of 20its obligation to this fund. Delinquent payments of 21contributions due under this Section may, with interest, be 22recovered by civil action against the participating 23municipalities or participating instrumentalities. 24Municipality contributions, other than the amount necessary 25for employee contributions, for periods of service by 26employees from whose earnings no deductions were made for   SB2802 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1employee contributions to the fund, may be charged to the 2municipality reserve for the municipality or participating 3instrumentality.4    (i) Contributions by participating instrumentalities shall 5be determined as provided herein except that the percentage 6derived under subparagraph 2 of paragraph (b) of this Section, 7and the amount payable under subparagraph 4 of paragraph (a) 8of this Section, shall be based on an amortization period of 10 9years.10    (j) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Section, 11the additional unfunded liability accruing as a result of 12Public Act 94-712 shall be amortized over a period of 30 years 13beginning on January 1 of the second calendar year following 14the calendar year in which Public Act 94-712 takes effect, 15except that the employer may provide for a longer amortization 16period by adopting a resolution or ordinance specifying a 1735-year or 40-year period and submitting a certified copy of 18the ordinance or resolution to the fund no later than June 1 of 19the calendar year following the calendar year in which Public 20Act 94-712 takes effect. 21    (k) If the amount of a participating employee's reported 22earnings for any of the 12-month periods used to determine the 23final rate of earnings exceeds the employee's 12-month 24reported earnings with the same employer for the previous year 25by the greater of 6% or 1.5 times the annual increase in the 26Consumer Price Index-U, as established by the United States   SB2802 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1Department of Labor for the preceding September, the 2participating municipality or participating instrumentality 3that paid those earnings shall pay to the Fund, in addition to 4any other contributions required under this Article, the 5present value of the increase in the pension resulting from 6the portion of the increase in reported earnings that is in 7excess of the greater of 6% or 1.5 times the annual increase in 8the Consumer Price Index-U, as determined by the Fund. This 9present value shall be computed on the basis of the actuarial 10assumptions and tables used in the most recent actuarial 11valuation of the Fund that is available at the time of the 12computation.13    Whenever it determines that a payment is or may be 14required under this subsection (k), the fund shall calculate 15the amount of the payment and bill the participating 16municipality or participating instrumentality for that amount. 17The bill shall specify the calculations used to determine the 18amount due. If the participating municipality or participating 19instrumentality disputes the amount of the bill, it may, 20within 30 days after receipt of the bill, apply to the fund in 21writing for a recalculation. The application must specify in 22detail the grounds of the dispute. Upon receiving a timely 23application for recalculation, the fund shall review the 24application and, if appropriate, recalculate the amount due. 25The participating municipality and participating 26instrumentality contributions required under this subsection   SB2802 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1(k) may be paid in the form of a lump sum within 90 days after 2receipt of the bill. If the participating municipality and 3participating instrumentality contributions are not paid 4within 90 days after receipt of the bill, then interest will be 5charged at a rate equal to the fund's annual actuarially 6assumed rate of return on investment compounded annually from 7the 91st day after receipt of the bill. Payments must be 8concluded within 7 years after receipt of the bill by the 9participating municipality or participating instrumentality.10    When assessing payment for any amount due under this 11subsection (k), the fund shall exclude earnings increases 12resulting from overload or overtime earnings.13    When assessing payment for any amount due under this 14subsection (k), the fund shall exclude earnings increases 15resulting from payments for unused vacation time, but only for 16payments for unused vacation time made in the final 3 months of 17the final rate of earnings period.18    When assessing payment for any amount due under this 19subsection (k), the fund shall also exclude earnings increases 20attributable to standard employment promotions resulting in 21increased responsibility and workload.22    When assessing payment for any amount due under this 23subsection (k), the fund shall exclude reportable earnings 24increases resulting from periods where the member was paid 25through workers' compensation. 26    This subsection (k) does not apply to earnings increases   SB2802 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1due to amounts paid as required by federal or State law or 2court mandate or to earnings increases due to the 3participating employee returning to the regular number of 4hours worked after having a temporary reduction in the number 5of hours worked. 6    This subsection (k) does not apply to earnings increases 7paid to individuals under contracts or collective bargaining 8agreements entered into, amended, or renewed before January 1, 92012 (the effective date of Public Act 97-609), earnings 10increases paid to members who are 10 years or more from 11retirement eligibility, or earnings increases resulting from 12an increase in the number of hours required to be worked. 13    When assessing payment for any amount due under this 14subsection (k), the fund shall also exclude earnings 15attributable to personnel policies adopted before January 1, 162012 (the effective date of Public Act 97-609) as long as those 17policies are not applicable to employees who begin service on 18or after January 1, 2012 (the effective date of Public Act 1997-609). 20    The change made to this Section by Public Act 100-139 is a 21clarification of existing law and is intended to be 22retroactive to January 1, 2012 (the effective date of Public 23Act 97-609). 24(Source: P.A. 103-464, eff. 8-4-23; 104-284, eff. 8-15-25.) 25    (40 ILCS 5/7-205)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-205)  SB2802 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1    Sec. 7-205. Reserves for annuities. Appropriate reserves 2shall be created for payment of all annuities granted under 3this Article at the time such annuities are granted and in 4amounts determined to be necessary under actuarial tables 5adopted by the Board upon recommendation of the actuary of the 6fund. All annuities payable shall be charged to the annuity 7reserve.8    1. Amounts credited to annuity reserves shall be derived 9by transfer of all the employee credits from the appropriate 10employee reserves and by charges to the municipality reserve 11of those municipalities in which the retiring employee has 12accumulated service. If a retiring employee has accumulated 13service in more than one participating municipality or 14participating instrumentality, the municipality charges for 15non-concurrent service shall be calculated as follows:16        (A) for purposes of calculating the annuity reserve, 17    an annuity will be calculated based on service and 18    adjusted earnings with each employer (without regard to 19    the vesting requirement contained in subsection (a) of 20    Section 7-142); and 21        (B) the difference between the municipality charges 22    for the actual annuity granted and the aggregation of the 23    municipality charges based upon the ratio of each from 24    those calculations to the aggregated total from paragraph 25    (A) of this item 1. 26    Aggregate municipality charges for concurrent service   SB2802 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1shall be prorated based on the employee's earnings. The 2municipality charges for retirement annuities calculated under 3subparagraph a. of paragraph 1. of subsection (a) of Section 47-142 shall be prorated based on actual contributions.5    2. Supplemental annuities shall be handled as a separate 6annuity and amounts to be credited to the annuity reserve 7therefor shall be derived in the same manner as a regular 8annuity.9    3. When a retirement annuity is granted to an employee 10with a spouse eligible for a surviving spouse annuity, there 11shall be credited to the annuity reserve an amount to fund the 12cost of both the retirement and surviving spouse annuity as a 13joint and survivors annuity.14    4. Beginning January 1, 1989, when a retirement annuity is 15awarded, an amount equal to the present value of the $8,000 16($3,000 for those who first retired prior to the effective 17date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly) 18$3,000 death benefit payable upon the death of the annuitant 19shall be transferred to the annuity reserve from the 20appropriate municipality reserves in the same manner as the 21transfer for annuities.22    5. All annuity reserves shall be revalued annually as of 23December 31. Beginning as of December 31, 1973, adjustment 24required therein by such revaluation shall be charged or 25credited to the earnings and experience variation reserve.26    6. There shall be credited to the annuity reserve all of   SB2802 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1the payments made by annuitants under Section 7-144.2, plus an 2additional amount from the earnings and experience variation 3reserve to fund the cost of the incremental annuities granted 4to annuitants making these payments.5    7. As of December 31, 1972, the excess in the annuity 6reserve shall be transferred to the municipality reserves. An 7amount equal to the deficiency in the reserve of participating 8municipalities and participating instrumentalities which have 9no participating employees shall be allocated to their 10reserves. The remainder shall be allocated in amounts 11proportionate to the present value, as of January 1, 1972, of 12annuities of annuitants of the remaining participating 13municipalities and participating instrumentalities.14(Source: P.A. 97-319, eff. 1-1-12; 97-609, eff. 1-1-12; 1597-813, eff. 7-13-12.) 16    (40 ILCS 5/7-206)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-206)17    Sec. 7-206. Death Reserve. All death benefit payments 18shall be charged to the Death Reserve, other than the $8,000 19($3,000 for those who first retired prior to the effective 20date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly) 21$3,000 death benefits paid after December 31, 1988 upon the 22death of an annuitant. All contributions for death purposes 23under Section 7-172(b)4 shall be credited to the same reserve. 24Whenever the balance in such reserve at the close of a year 25exceeds 100% of the average annual charges to this account   SB2802 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 17391 RPS 30816 b1during the 3 preceding calendar years, the basic actuarial 2assumptions upon which municipality contribution rates for 3these purposes are based, shall be reviewed and revised in 4such manner as is deemed necessary to reduce such balance. 5(Source: P.A. 89-136, eff. 7-14-95.) 6    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 7Section 8.50 as follows: 8    (30 ILCS 805/8.50 new)9    Sec. 8.50. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 108 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 11the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 12Act of the 104th General Assembly. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law, except that the changes to Sections 7-158, 157-164, 7-172, 7-205, and 7-206 of the Illinois Pension Code 16take effect January 1, 2027.